Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-547
Aquatic
invasive species; wildlife; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to prevent the release or importation
into the State of Nebraska of any aquatic
invasive species or any live wildlife which may cause economic
or ecologic harm or be injurious to human beings, agriculture, horticulture,
forestry, water, or
wildlife or wildlife resources of the state. It is further the intent of the
Legislature to prevent the commercial exploitation or exportation of any aquatic invasive species or any dead
or live wildlife taken from the wild.

Laws 1993, LB 830, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-535;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 267;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 78;

Laws 2012, LB391, § 9.